test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-midaagwd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - midāgõd: # pronouns 10 'eng something /est miski /fin' - full paradigm
     midāgõd+Pron+Sg+Nom: midāgõd
     midāgõd+Pron+Sg+Gen: midāgõd
     midāgõd+Pron+Sg+Par: midāgõd
     midāgõd+Pron+Sg+Dat: midāgõn
     midāgõd+Pron+Sg+Ins: midāgõks
     midāgõd+Pron+Sg+Ill: [midāgõ, midāgõz]
     midāgõd+Pron+Sg+Ela: midāgõst
     midāgõd+Pron+Pl+Nom: midāgõd
     midāgõd+Pron+Pl+Gen: midāgõd
     midāgõd+Pron+Pl+Par: midāgidi
     midāgõd+Pron+Pl+Dat: midāgõdõn
     midāgõd+Pron+Pl+Ins: midāgõdõks
     midāgõd+Pron+Pl+Ill: midāgiž
     midāgõd+Pron+Pl+Ela: midāgist
